Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2391.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 405 of the act of January 30, 1974 (P.L.13, No.6), referred to as the Loan Interest and Protection Law, is amended to read:1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526272829 Section 405. Prepayment Penalty Prohibited.--Residential mortgage obligations made primarily for personal, family or household purposes and contracted for on or after the effective date of this act may be prepaid without any penalty or other charge for such prepayment at any time before the end of the period of the loan.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2391PN3211 - 2 - 1234567